test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaavir_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - käävir: # 2B v-k, v->h, VV > V
    käävir+N+Sg+Nom: käävir
    käävir+N+Sg+Gen: käähir
    käävir+N+Sg+Acc: käähir
    käävir+N+Sg+Ill: kähirân
    käävir+N+Sg+Loc: kähirist
    käävir+N+Sg+Com: kähiráin
    käävir+N+Sg+Abe: käähirttáá
    käävir+N+Ess: kävirin                   #kähirin
    käävir+N+Par: kävirid                   #kähirid
    käävir+N+Pl+Nom: kähireh
    käävir+N+Pl+Gen: kähirij
    käävir+N+Pl+Acc: kähirijd
    käävir+N+Pl+Ill: kähiráid
    käävir+N+Pl+Loc: kähirijn
    käävir+N+Pl+Com: kähirijguin
    käävir+N+Pl+Abe: kähirijttáá
